District of Columbia statutes.
28-5002

Prohibitions.

(a)

A person or entity shall not:

(1)

Transmit, or assist in the transmission of, a commercial electronic mail message that:

(A)

Falsely identifies electronic mail transmission information, including header information, or other routing information; or

(B)

Contains false or misleading information in the subject line; or

(2)

Transmit, or assist in the transmission of, a commercial electronic mail message using a third party’s Internet address, domain name, or identity without the third party’s consent for the purpose of transmitting electronic mail in a manner that makes it appear that the third party was the sender of the message or that results in responses to the message being directed to the third party.

(b)

The prohibitions contained in this section shall apply to any person or entity who transmits, or who assists in the transmission of, a commercial electronic mail message:

(1)

From a computer located in the District of Columbia;

(2)

To an electronic mail address held by a resident of the District of Columbia;

(3)

To an electronic mail service provider with equipment or its principal place of business in the District of Columbia; or

(4)

To a domain name registered to a resident of the District of Columbia.

History

Sept. 11, 2008, D.C. Law 17-230, § 3, 55 DCR 8311
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 245(c), 56 DCR 1117

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 17-353 validated a previously made technical correction in the section designation.